Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6003.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Education aid to be indexed to achieving low- and moderate-income housing
levels..
(a) Effective January 1, 2026, a community's receipt of permanent foundation education
aid pursuant to chapter 7.2 of title 16 shall be indexed to a municipality's ability to successfully
meet its low- and moderate-income housing goals as provided for in this chapter, in the following
manner:
(1) For purposes of this section, commencing on January 1, 2026, and for each successive
year thereafter, every community shall have a five (5) year period to meet the goal of ten percent
(10%) of the year-round units or, in the case of certain urban towns or cities, fifteen percent (15%)
of the occupied rental housing units as being low- and moderate-income housing, as provided for
in § 45-53-3. If a community's minimum percentage requirements of low- or moderate-income
housing are adjusted by statute, then the provisions of this section shall be indexed and tied to those
adjustments such that whether a community's education aid is increased or decreased will be
dependent upon the adjusted minimum amount of low- and moderate-income housing that is
required;
(2) After the five (5) year period provided for in subsection (a)(1) of this section, and for
each year thereafter, any community that exceeds the required minimum goals identified in

subsection (a)(1) of this section for low- and moderate-income housing shall have its education aid
increased in a percentage amount equal to the percentage by which the community exceeds its
required minimum goals of ten percent (10%) or fifteen percent (15%) whichever is applicable.
Any community which receives an increase in education aid pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall be eligible to receive increases as long as the community maintains an amount of low-
and moderate-income housing in excess of the community’s statutory minimum requirements.
(3) The statewide planning program within the department of administration shall certify
to the general assembly on or before April 1 of each year as to the percentage and amount of low-
and moderate-income housing in a municipality as of the previous year, for purposes of
implementing this section.
(b) As used herein:
(1) "Community" means the municipality or municipalities serviced by, a part of, or in a
given school district; and
(2) "Education aid" means the permanent foundation education aid received by each school
district established pursuant to the provisions of chapter 7.2 of title 16, "The Education Equity and
Property Tax Relief Act."
SECTION 2. Section 16-7.2-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7.2 entitled "The
Education Equity and Property Tax Relief Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7.2-3. Permanent foundation education aid established.
(a) Beginning in the 2012 fiscal year, the following foundation education-aid formula shall
take effect. The foundation education aid for each district shall be the sum of the core instruction
amount in subsection (a)(1) of this section and the amount to support high-need students in
subsection (a)(2) of this section, which shall be multiplied by the district state-share ratio calculated
pursuant to § 16-7.2-4 to determine the foundation aid.
(1) The core instruction amount shall be an amount equal to a statewide, per-pupil core
instruction amount as established by the department of elementary and secondary education,
derived from the average of northeast regional expenditure data for the states of Rhode Island,
Massachusetts, Connecticut, and New Hampshire from the National Center for Education Statistics
(NCES) that will adequately fund the student instructional needs as described in the basic education
program and multiplied by the district average daily membership as defined in § 16-7-22.
Expenditure data in the following categories: instruction and support services for students,
instruction, general administration, school administration, and other support services from the
National Public Education Financial Survey, as published by NCES, and enrollment data from the
Common Core of Data, also published by NCES, will be used when determining the core
LC000860 - Page 2 of 6

instruction amount. The core instruction amount will be updated annually. For the purpose of
calculating this formula, school districts’ resident average daily membership shall exclude charter
school and state-operated school students.
(2) The amount to support high-need students beyond the core instruction amount shall be
determined by:
(i) Multiplying a student success factor of forty percent (40%) by the core instruction per-
pupil amount described in subsection (a)(1) of this section and applying that amount for each
resident child whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of
federal poverty guidelines, hereinafter referred to as “poverty status.” By October 1, 2022, as part
of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to state fiscal year 2024 and thereafter, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and utilize a poverty measure that
in the department’s assessment most accurately serves as a proxy for the poverty status referenced
in this subsection and does not rely on the administration of school nutrition programs. The
department shall utilize this measure in calculations pursuant to this subsection related to the
application of the student success factor, in calculations pursuant to § 16-7.2-4 related to the
calculation of the state share ratio, and in the formulation of estimates pursuant to subsection (b)
below. The department may also include any recommendations which seek to mitigate any
disruptions associated with the implementation of this new poverty measure or improve the
accuracy of its calculation. Beginning with the FY 2024 calculation, students whose family income
is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines will be
determined by participation in the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP). The number
of students directly certified through the department of human services shall be multiplied by a
factor of 1.6; and
(ii) Multiplying a multilingual learner (MLL) factor of twenty percent (20%) by the core
instruction per-pupil amount described in subsection (a)(1) of this section, applying that amount
for each resident child identified in the three lowest proficiency categories using widely adopted,
independent standards and assessments in accordance with subsection (f)(1) of this section and as
identified by the commissioner and defined by regulations of the council on elementary and
secondary education. Local education agencies shall report annually to the department of
elementary and secondary education by September 1, outlining the planned and prior year use of
all funding pursuant to this subsection to provide services to MLL students in accordance with
requirements set forth by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The
department shall review the use of funds to ensure consistency with established best practices.
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide an estimate of the
LC000860 - Page 3 of 6

foundation education aid cost as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4. The estimate
shall include the most recent data available as well as an adjustment for average daily membership
growth or decline based on the prior year experience.
(c) In addition, the department shall report updated figures based on the average daily
membership as of October 1 by December 1.
(d) Local education agencies may set aside a portion of funds received under subsection
(a) to expand learning opportunities such as after school and summer programs, full-day
kindergarten and/or multiple pathway programs, provided that the basic education program and all
other approved programs required in law are funded.
(e) The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate such
regulations as are necessary to implement fully the purposes of this chapter.
(f)(1) By October 1, 2023, as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to
state fiscal year 2025, the department of elementary and secondary education shall evaluate the
number of students by district who qualify as multilingual learner (MLL) students and MLL
students whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal
poverty guidelines. The submission shall also include segmentation of these populations by levels
as dictated by the WIDA multilingual learner assessment tool used as an objective benchmark for
English proficiency. The department shall also prepare and produce expense data sourced from the
uniform chart of accounts to recommend funding levels required to support students at the various
levels of proficiency as determined by the WIDA assessment tool. Utilizing this information, the
department shall recommend a funding solution to meet the needs of multilingual learners; this may
include but not be limited to inclusion of MLL needs within the core foundation formula amount
through one or multiple weights to distinguish different students of need or through categorical
means.
(2) By October 1, 2024, as part of its budget submission pursuant to § 35-3-4 relative to
state fiscal year 2026, the department of elementary and secondary education shall develop
alternatives to identify students whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent
(185%) of federal poverty guidelines through participation in state-administered programs,
including, but not limited to, the supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP), and RIteCare
and other programs that include the collection of required supporting documentation. The
department may also include any recommendations that seek to mitigate any disruptions associated
with implementation of this new poverty measure or improve the accuracy of its calculation.
(3) The department shall also report with its annual budget request information regarding
local contributions to education aid and compliance with §§ 16-7-23 and 16-7-24. The report shall
LC000860 - Page 4 of 6

also compare these local contributions to state foundation education aid by community. The
department shall also report compliance to each city or town school committee and city or town
council.
(g) The provisions of § 45-53-16 indexing education aid to achieving low- and moderate-
income housing levels shall be applied after the yearly amount of education aid provided for under
subsection (a) of this section is calculated.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000860
========
LC000860 - Page 5 of 6